California statutes. Labor Code
(i) A contractor covered by this section who has agreed to be covered by an apprenticeship program’s standards upon the issuance of the approval certificate, or who has been previously approved for an apprenticeship program in the craft or trade, shall employ the number of apprentices or the ratio of apprentices to journeymen stipulated in the applicable apprenticeship standards, but in no event less than the 1-to-5 ratio required by subdivision (g).

(j) Upon proper showing by a contractor that he or she employs apprentices in a particular craft or trade in the state on all of his or her contracts on an annual average of not less than one hour of apprentice work for every five hours of labor performed by journeymen, the Administrator of Apprenticeship may grant a certificate exempting the contractor from the 1-to-5 hourly ratio, as set forth in this section for that craft or
 trade.

(k) An apprenticeship program has the discretion to grant to a participating contractor or contractor association a certificate, which shall be subject to the approval of the Administrator of Apprenticeship, exempting the contractor from the 1-to-5 ratio set forth in this section when it finds that any one of the following conditions is met:

(1) Unemployment for the previous three-month period in the area exceeds an average of 15 percent.

(2) The number of apprentices in training in the area exceeds a ratio of 1 to 5.

(3) There is a showing that the apprenticeable craft or trade is replacing at least one-thirtieth of its journeymen annually through apprenticeship training, either on a statewide basis or on a local basis.

(4) Assignment of an apprentice to any work performed under a public works contract would create a condition that would jeopardize his or her life or the life, safety, or property of fellow employees or the public at large, or the specific task to which the apprentice is to be assigned is of a nature that training cannot be provided by a journeyman.

(l) If an exemption is granted pursuant to subdivision (k) to an organization that represents contractors in a specific trade from the 1-to-5 ratio on a local or statewide basis, the member contractors shall not be required to submit individual applications for approval to local joint apprenticeship committees, if they are already covered by the local apprenticeship standards.

(m) (1) A contractor to whom a contract is awarded, who, in performing any of
 the work under the contract, employs journeymen or apprentices in any apprenticeable craft or trade shall contribute to the California Apprenticeship Council the same amount that the director determines is the prevailing amount of apprenticeship training contributions in the area of the public works site. A contractor may take as a credit for payments to the council any amounts paid by the contractor to an approved apprenticeship program that can supply apprentices to the site of the public works project. The contractor may add the amount of the contributions in computing his or her bid for the contract.

(2) (A) At the conclusion of the 2002–03 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the California Apprenticeship Council shall distribute training contributions received by the council under this subdivision, less the expenses of the Department of Industrial Relations for administering this subdivision, by making grants
 to approved apprenticeship programs for the purpose of training apprentices. The grant funds shall be distributed as follows:

(i) If there is an approved multiemployer apprenticeship program serving the same craft or trade and geographic area for which the training contributions were made to the council, a grant to that program shall be made.

(ii) If there are two or more approved multiemployer apprenticeship programs serving the same craft or trade and county for which the training contributions were made to the council, the grant shall be divided among those programs based on the number of apprentices from that county registered in each program.

(iii) All training contributions not distributed under clauses (i) and (ii) shall be used to defray the future expenses of the Department of Industrial Relations for the
 administration and enforcement of apprenticeship and preapprenticeship standards and requirements under this code.

(B) An apprenticeship program shall only be eligible to receive grant funds pursuant to this subdivision if the apprenticeship program agrees, prior to the receipt of any grant funds, to keep adequate records that document the expenditure of grant funds and to make all records available to the Department of Industrial Relations so that the Department of Industrial Relations is able to verify that grant funds were used solely for training apprentices. For purposes of this subparagraph, adequate records include, but are not limited to, invoices, receipts, and canceled checks that account for the expenditure of grant funds. This subparagraph shall not be deemed to require an apprenticeship program to provide the Department of Industrial Relations with more documentation than is necessary to verify the appropriate expenditure of grant
 funds made pursuant to this subdivision.

(C) The Department of Industrial Relations shall verify that grants made pursuant to this subdivision are used solely to fund training apprentices. If an apprenticeship program is unable to demonstrate how grant funds are expended or if an apprenticeship program is found to be using grant funds for purposes other than training apprentices, then the apprenticeship program shall not be eligible to receive any future grant pursuant to this subdivision and the Department of Industrial Relations may initiate the process to rescind the registration of the apprenticeship program.

(3) All training contributions received pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the Apprenticeship Training Contribution Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, all moneys in the Apprenticeship Training
 Contribution Fund shall be used for the purpose of carrying out this subdivision and to pay the expenses of the Department of Industrial Relations.

(n) The body awarding the contract shall cause to be inserted in the contract stipulations to effectuate this section. The stipulations shall fix the responsibility of compliance with this section for all apprenticeable occupations with the prime contractor.

(o) This section does not apply to contracts of general contractors or to contracts of specialty contractors not bidding for work through a general or prime contractor when the contracts of general contractors or those specialty contractors involve less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).

(p) An awarding body that implements an approved labor compliance program in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 1771.5
 may, with the approval of the director, assist in the enforcement of this section under the terms and conditions prescribed by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 704, Sec. 17.   (AB 235)   Effective September 22, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1777.6.

An employer or a labor union shall not refuse to accept otherwise qualified employees as registered apprentices on any public works on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, except as provided in Section 3077 of this code and Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 788, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1777.7.

(a) (1) If the Labor Commissioner or his or her designee determines after an investigation that a contractor or subcontractor knowingly violated Section 1777.5, the contractor and any subcontractor responsible for the violation shall forfeit, as a civil penalty to the state or political subdivision on whose behalf the contract is made or awarded, not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each full calendar day of noncompliance. The amount of this penalty may be reduced by the Labor Commissioner if the amount of the penalty would be disproportionate to the severity of the violation. A contractor or subcontractor that knowingly commits a second or subsequent violation within a three-year period, if the noncompliance results in apprenticeship
 training not being provided as required by this chapter, shall forfeit as a civil penalty the sum of not more than three hundred dollars ($300) for each full calendar day of noncompliance.

(2) In lieu of the penalty provided for in this subdivision, the Labor Commissioner may, for a first-time violation and with the concurrence of an apprenticeship program described in subdivision (d) of Section 1777.5, order the contractor or subcontractor to provide apprentice employment equivalent to the work hours that would have been provided for apprentices during the period of noncompliance.

(b) The Labor Commissioner shall consider, in setting the amount of a monetary penalty, all of the following circumstances:

(1) Whether the violation was intentional.

(2) Whether the party has committed other violations of Section 1777.5.

(3) Whether, upon notice of the violation, the party took steps to voluntarily remedy the violation.

(4) Whether, and to what extent, the violation resulted in lost training opportunities for apprentices.

(5) Whether, and to what extent, the violation otherwise harmed apprentices or apprenticeship programs.

(c) (1) The Labor Commissioner or his or her designee shall issue a civil wage and penalty assessment, in accordance with the provisions of Section 1741, upon determination of penalties assessed under subdivisions (a) and (b). Review of a civil wage and penalty assessment issued under this subdivision may be requested in accordance with the
 provisions of Section 1742. The regulations of the Director of Industrial Relations, which govern proceedings for review of civil wage and penalty assessments and the withholding of contract payments under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1720) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770), shall apply.

(2) For purposes of this section, a determination issued pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) includes a determination that has been approved by the Labor Commissioner and issued by an awarding body that has been authorized to assist the director in the enforcement of Section 1777.5 pursuant to subdivision (p) of that section. The Labor Commissioner may intervene in any proceeding for review of a determination issued by an awarding body. If the involvement of the Labor Commissioner in a labor compliance program enforcement action is limited to a review of the determination and the matter is resolved without litigation by or against the Labor
 Commissioner or the department, the awarding body shall enforce any applicable penalties, as specified in this section, and shall deposit any penalties and forfeitures collected in the General Fund.

(d) The determination of the Labor Commissioner as to the amount of the penalty imposed under subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be reviewable only for an abuse of discretion.

(e) If a subcontractor is found to have violated Section 1777.5, the prime contractor of the project is not liable for any penalties under subdivision (a) unless the prime contractor had knowledge of the subcontractor’s failure to comply with the provisions of Section 1777.5 or unless the prime contractor fails to comply with any of the following requirements:

(1) The contract executed between the contractor and the subcontractor for the performance of
 work on the public works project shall include a copy of the provisions of Sections 1771, 1775, 1776, 1777.5, 1813, and 1815.

(2) The contractor shall continually monitor a subcontractor’s use of apprentices required to be employed on the public works project pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1777.5, including, but not limited to, periodic review of the certified payroll of the subcontractor.

(3) Upon becoming aware of a failure of the subcontractor to employ the required number of apprentices, the contractor shall take corrective action, including, but not limited to, retaining funds due to the subcontractor for work performed on the public works project until the failure is corrected.

(4) Prior to making the final payment to the subcontractor for work performed on the public works project, the contractor shall
 obtain a declaration signed under penalty of perjury from the subcontractor that the subcontractor has employed the required number of apprentices on the public works project.

(f) The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall notify the contractor on a public works project within 15 days of the receipt by the division of a complaint that a subcontractor on that public works project knowingly violated Section 1777.5.

(g) The interpretation of Section 1777.5 and the substantive requirements of this section applicable to contractors or subcontractors shall be in accordance with the regulations of the California Apprenticeship Council. 

(h) The Director of Industrial Relations may adopt regulations to establish guidelines for the imposition of monetary penalties.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 297, Sec. 3.   (AB 2744)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1778.

Every person, who individually or as a representative of an awarding or public body or officer, or as a contractor or subcontractor doing public work, or agent or officer thereof, who takes, receives, or conspires with another to take or receive, for his or her own use or the use of any other person any portion of the wages of any worker or working subcontractor, in connection with services rendered upon any public work is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 23.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1779.

Any person or agent or officer thereof who charges, collects, or attempts to charge or collect, directly or indirectly, a fee or valuable consideration for registering any person for public work, or for giving information as to where such employment may be procured, or for placing, assisting in placing, or attempting to place, any person in public work, whether the person is to work directly for the State, or any political subdivision or for a contractor or subcontractor doing public work is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1780.

Any person acting on behalf of the State or any political subdivision, or any contractor or subcontractor or agent or representative thereof, doing any public work who places any order for the employment of a worker on public work where the filling of the order for employment involves the charging of a fee, or the receiving of a valuable consideration from any applicant for employment is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 24.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1781.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a contractor may, subject to paragraphs (2) and (3), bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover from the body awarding a contract for a public work or otherwise undertaking any public work any increased costs incurred by the contractor as a result of any decision by the body, the Department of Industrial Relations, or a court that classifies, after the time at which the body accepts the contractor’s bid or awards the contractor a contract in circumstances where no bid is solicited, the work covered by the bid or contract as a “public work,” as defined in this chapter, to which Section 1771 applies, if that body, before the bid opening or awarding of the contract, failed to identify as a “public work,” as defined in this chapter, in the bid specification or in the contract documents that portion of the work that the decision classifies as a “public work.”

(2) The body awarding a contract for a public work or otherwise undertaking any public work is not liable for increased costs in an action described in paragraph (1) if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The contractor did not directly submit a bid to, or directly contract with, that body.

(B) The body stated in the contract, agreement, ordinance, or other written arrangement by which it undertook the public work that the work described in paragraph (1) was a “public work,” as defined in this chapter, to which Section 1771 applies, and obligated the party with whom the body makes its written arrangement to cause the work described in paragraph (1) to be performed as a “public work.”

(C) The body fulfilled all of its duties, if any, under the Civil Code or any other provision of law pertaining to the body providing and maintaining bonds to secure the payment of contractors, including the payment of wages to workers performing the work described in paragraph (1).

(3) If a contractor did not directly submit a bid to, or directly contract with a body awarding a contract for, or otherwise undertaking a public work, the liability of that body in an action commenced by the contractor under subdivision (a) is limited to that portion of a judgment, obtained by that contractor against the body that solicited the contractor’s bid or awarded the contract to the contractor, that the contractor is unable to satisfy. For purposes of this paragraph, a contractor may not be deemed to be unable to satisfy any portion of a judgment unless, in addition to other collection measures, the contractor has made a good faith attempt to collect that portion of the judgment against a surety bond, guarantee, or some other form of assurance.

(b) When construction has not commenced at the time a final decision by the Department of Industrial Relations or a court classifies all or part of the work covered by the bid or contract as a “public work,” as defined in this chapter, the body that solicited the bid or awarded the contract shall rebid the “public work” covered by the contract as a “public work,” any bid that was submitted and any contract that was executed for this work are null and void, and the contractor may not be compensated for any nonconstruction work already performed unless the body soliciting the bid or awarding the contract has agreed to compensate the contractor for this work.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Awarding body” does not include the Department of General Services, the Department of Transportation, or the Department of Water Resources.

(2) “Increased costs” includes, but is not limited to:

(A) Labor cost increases required to be paid to workers who perform or performed work on the “public work” as a result of the events described in subdivision (a).

(B) Penalties for a violation of this article for which the contractor is liable, and which violation is the result of the events described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 804, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1782.

(a) A charter city shall not receive or use state funding or financial assistance for a construction project if the city has a charter provision or ordinance that authorizes a contractor to not comply with the provisions of this article on any public works contract.

(b) A charter city shall not receive or use state funding or financial assistance for a construction project if the city has awarded, within the prior two years, a public works contract without requiring
 the contractor to comply with all of the provisions of this article. This subdivision shall not apply if the charter city’s failure to include the prevailing wage or apprenticeship requirement in a particular contract was inadvertent and contrary to a city charter provision or ordinance that otherwise requires compliance with this article.

(c) A charter city is not disqualified by subdivision (a) from receiving or using state funding or financial
 assistance for its construction projects if the charter city has
 a local prevailing wage ordinance for all its public works contracts that includes requirements that in all respects are equal to or greater than the requirements imposed by the provisions of this article and that do not authorize a contractor to not comply with this article.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following shall apply:

(1) A public works contract does not include contracts for projects of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or less when the project is for construction work, or
 projects of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or less when the project is for alteration, demolition, repair, or maintenance work.

(2) A charter city includes any agency of a charter city and any entity controlled by a charter city whose contracts would be subject to this article.

(3) A “construction project” means a project that involves the award of a public works contract.

(4) State funding or financial assistance includes direct state funding, state loans and loan guarantees, state tax credits, and any other type of state financial support for a construction project. State funding or financial assistance does not include revenues that charter cities are entitled to receive without conditions under the
 California Constitution.

(e) The Director of Industrial Relations shall maintain a list of charter cities that may receive and use state funding or financial assistance for their construction projects.

(f) (1) This section does not restrict a charter city from receiving or using state funding or financial assistance that was awarded to the city prior to January 1, 2015, or from receiving or using state funding or financial assistance to complete a contract that was awarded prior to January 1, 2015.

(2) A charter city is not disqualified by subdivision (b) from receiving or using state funding or financial assistance for its construction projects based on the city’s failure to require a contractor to comply with this article in performing a contract the city advertised for bid or awarded prior to January 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 794, Sec. 2.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1784.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a contractor may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover from the hiring party that the contractor directly contracts with, any increased costs attributable solely to the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the difference between the wages actually paid to an employee and the wages that were required to be paid to an employee under this chapter, any penalties or other sums required to be paid under this chapter, and costs and attorney’s fees for the action incurred by the contractor as a result of any decision by the Department of Industrial Relations, the Labor and Workforce Development Agency, or a court that classifies, after the time at which the
 hiring party accepts the contractor’s bid, awards the contractor a contract under circumstances when no bid is solicited, or otherwise allows construction by the contractor to proceed, the work covered by the project, or any portion thereof, as a “public work,” as defined in this chapter, except to the extent that either of the following is true:

(1) The owner or developer or its agent expressly advised the contractor that the work to be covered by the contract would be a “public work,” as defined in this chapter, or is otherwise subject to the payment of prevailing wages.

(2) The hiring party expressly advised the contractor that the work subject to the contract would be a “public work,” as defined in this
 chapter, or is otherwise subject to the payment of prevailing wages.

(b) (1) To be entitled to the recovery of increased costs described in subdivision (a), the contractor shall notify the hiring party and the owner or developer within 30 days after receipt of the notice of a decision by the Department of Industrial Relations or the Labor and Workforce Development Agency, or the initiation of any action in a court alleging, that the work covered by the project, or any portion thereof, is a “public work,” as defined in this chapter.

(2) The notice provided pursuant to this subdivision shall
 set forth the legal name, address, and telephone number of the contractor, and the name, address, and telephone number of the contractor’s representative, if any, and shall be given by registered or certified mail, express mail, or overnight delivery by an express service carrier.

(c) A contractor is not required to list any prevailing wages or apprenticeship standard violations on a prequalification questionnaire that are the direct result of the failure of the owner or developer or its agent, or a hiring party, to notify the contractor that the project, or any portion thereof, was a “public work,” as defined in this chapter.

(d) This section does not apply to private residential projects built on private property unless the project is built pursuant to an agreement with a state
 agency, redevelopment agency, or local public housing authority.

(e) This section does not apply if the conduct of the contractor caused the project to be a “public work,” as defined in this chapter, or if the contractor has actual knowledge that the work is a “public work,” as defined in this chapter.

(f) A contractor may seek recovery pursuant to this section only from a hiring party with whom the contractor has a direct contract.

(g) For purposes of this section, “contractor” means a person or entity licensed by the Contractors’ State Licensing Board that has a direct contract with the
 hiring party to provide services on private property or for the benefit of a private owner or developer.

(h) For purposes of this section, “hiring party” means the party that has a direct contract for services provided by the contractor who is seeking recovery pursuant to subdivision (a) on a private works project that was subsequently determined to be a public work by the Department of Industrial Relations or the Labor and Workforce Development Agency, or by the initiation of any action in a court alleging that the work covered by the project, or any portion thereof, was a
 public work.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 161, Sec. 1.   (AB 1939)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1785.

(a) The director shall establish and maintain a strategic enforcement unit focused on construction, alteration, and repair projects. The unit shall enhance the department’s enforcement of this code in construction, alteration, and repair projects, including projects funded pursuant to Section 50675.1.3 of the Health and Safety Code and other publicly funded residential construction projects. The unit shall have primary responsibility for enforcement of this code in construction projects subject to Section 50675.1.3 of the Health and Safety Code. Any funds appropriated to the department for purposes of this section shall be administered and allocated by the director.

(b) The strategic enforcement unit described in subdivision (a) shall provide
 technical assistance to local public entities related to both of the following:

(1) Best practices for monitoring and enforcing requirements pertaining to construction, alteration, and repair projects paid for in whole or in part out of public funds, including, but not limited to, this chapter.

(2) Outreach and engagement with workers, employers, and state certified apprenticeship programs connected to construction, alteration, and repair projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 111, Sec. 26.   (AB 140)   Effective July 19, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Working Hours [1810. - 1815.]

1810.

Eight hours labor constitutes a legal day’s work in all cases where the same is performed under the authority of any law of this State, or under the direction, or control, or by the authority of any officer of this State acting in his official capacity, or under the direction, or control or by the authority of any municipal corporation, or of any officer thereof. A stipulation to that effect shall be made a part of all contracts to which the State or any municipal corporation therein is a party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1811.

The time of service of any worker employed upon public work is limited and restricted to eight hours during any one calendar day, and 40 hours during any one calendar week, except as hereinafter provided for under Section 1815.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 25.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.

Every contractor and subcontractor shall keep an accurate record showing the name of and actual hours worked each calendar day and each calendar week by each worker employed by him or her in connection with the public work. The record shall be kept open at all reasonable hours to the inspection of the awarding body and to the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 123.)
-------------------------------------------

1813.

The contractor or subcontractor shall, as a penalty to the state or political subdivision on whose behalf the contract is made or awarded, forfeit twenty-five dollars ($25) for each worker employed in the execution of the contract by the respective contractor or subcontractor for each calendar day during which the worker is required or permitted to work more than 8 hours in any one calendar day and 40 hours in any one calendar week in violation of the provisions of this article. In awarding any contract for public work, the awarding body shall cause to be inserted in the contract a stipulation to this effect. The awarding body shall take cognizance of all violations of this article committed in the course of the execution of the contract, and shall report them to the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 757, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2002, Ch. 28, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1814.

Any officer, agent, or representative of the State or any political subdivision who violates any provision of this article and any contractor or subcontractor or agent or representative thereof doing public work who neglects to comply with any provision of Section 1812 is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1816 by Stats. 1961, Ch. 238.)
-------------------------------------------

1815.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 1810 to 1814, inclusive, of this code, and notwithstanding any stipulation inserted in any contract pursuant to the requirements of said sections, work performed by employees of contractors in excess of 8 hours per day, and 40 hours during any one week, shall be permitted upon public work upon compensation for all hours worked in excess of 8 hours per day at not less than 112 times the basic rate of pay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Securing Workers’ Compensation [1860. - 1861.]

1860.

The awarding body shall cause to be inserted in every public works contract a clause providing that, in accordance with the provisions of Section 3700, every contractor will be required to secure the payment of compensation to his or her employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 26.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.

Each contractor to whom a public works contract is awarded shall sign and file with the awarding body the following certification prior to performing the work of the contract: “I am aware of the provisions of Section 3700 of the Labor Code which require every employer to be insured against liability for workers’ compensation or to undertake self-insurance in accordance with the provisions of that code, and I will comply with such provisions before commencing the performance of the work of this contract.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Public Agencies [1900. - 1901.]



  ARTICLE 1. Municipal Employees [1900. - 1901.]

1900.

Every employee of a city whose hours of labor exceed 120 in a week is entitled to be off duty at least three hours during every twenty-four hours for the purpose of procuring meals. No deduction of salary shall be made by reason thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1901.

Any officer or agent of a city having supervision and control of employees covered by this article who violates any provision hereof is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Firefighters [1960. - 1964.]

1960.

Neither the State nor any county, political subdivision, incorporated city, town, nor any other municipal corporation shall prohibit, deny or obstruct the right of firefighters to join any bona fide labor organization of their own choice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

1961.

As used in this chapter, the term “employees” means the employees of the fire departments and fire services of the State, counties, cities, cities and counties, districts, and other political subdivisions of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

1962.

Employees shall have the right to self-organization, to form, join, or assist labor organizations, to present grievances and recommendations regarding wages, salaries, hours, and working conditions to the governing body, and to discuss the same with such governing body, through such an organization, but shall not have the right to strike, or to recognize a picket line of a labor organization while in the course of the performance of their official duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

1963.

The enactment of this chapter shall not be construed as making the provisions of Section 923 of this code applicable to public employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

1964.

(a) The governing body of any regularly organized volunteer fire department may, but shall not be required to, adopt regulations governing the removal of volunteer firefighters from the volunteer fire department.

(b) In the event that the governing body chooses to adopt these regulations, it shall have the discretion, after soliciting comments from the membership of the volunteer fire department, to adopt any reasonable regulations which may, but need not, include some or all of the following elements, in addition to other provisions:

(1) Members of the department shall not be removed from membership, except for incompetence, misconduct, or failure to comply with the rules and regulations of the department. Removals, except for absenteeism at fires or meetings, shall be made only after a hearing with due notice, with stated charges, and with the right of the member to a review.

(2) The charges shall be in writing and may be made by the governing body. The burden of proving incompetency or misconduct shall be on the person alleging it.

(3) Hearings on the charges shall be held by the officer or body having the power to remove the person, or by a deputy or employee of the officer or body designated in writing for that purpose.

In case a deputy or other employee is so designated, he or she shall for the purpose of the hearing be vested with all the powers of the officer or body, and shall make a record of the hearing which shall be referred to the officer or body for review with his or her recommendations.

(4) The notice of the hearing shall specify the time and place of the hearing and state the body or person before whom the hearing will be held. Notice and a copy of the charges shall be served personally upon the accused member at least 10 days but not more than 30 days before the date of the hearing.

(5) A stenographer may be employed for the purpose of taking testimony at the hearing.

(6) The officer or body having the power to remove the person may suspend the person after charges are filed and pending disposition of the charges, and after the hearing may remove the person or may suspend him or her for a period of time not to exceed one year.

(7) Volunteer firefighters shall serve a probationary period of a length to be specified by the governing board, not to exceed one year. A probationary volunteer firefighter may be removed from membership without specification of cause. The decision to remove a probationer shall not require notice or a hearing.

(c) The requirement of subdivision (b) to solicit comments from the membership shall not be deemed to create a duty to meet and confer with the membership.

(d) In the event that a governing body of a regularly organized volunteer fire department adopts regulations governing removal of volunteer firefighters, the regulations shall not be interpreted as creating a property right in the volunteer firefighter job or position.

(e) When regulations have been adopted, and where the regulations provide for a hearing and decision by the governing body, a volunteer firefighter may commence a proceeding in accordance with the provisions of Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure to set aside the decision of the governing body on the ground that the decision is not supported by substantial evidence. The court shall not employ its independent judgment in reviewing the evidence. The proceeding shall be commenced within 90 days from the date that the governing body renders its decision. This remedy shall be the exclusive method for review of the governing body’s decision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 499, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. UNEMPLOYMENT RELIEF [2010. - 2014.]



  CHAPTER 1. Extension of Public Works [2010. - 2014.]

2010.

As used in this chapter, “State agency” means any department, division, board, bureau, or commission of the State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2011.

The Department of Finance shall ascertain and secure from the several State agencies tentative plans for the extension of public works which are best adapted to supply increased opportunities for advantageous public labor during periods of temporary unemployment. Such plans shall include estimates of the amount, character, and duration of employment, the number of employees who could be profitably employed therein, together with rates of wages and other information which the Department of Finance deems necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

2012.

The department shall keep constantly advised of industrial conditions throughout the State as affecting the employment of labor. Whenever the Governor represents or the division has reason to believe, that a period of extraordinary unemployment caused by industrial depression exists in the state, it shall immediately hold an inquiry into the facts relating thereto, and report to the Governor whether, in fact, such condition exists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 97.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2013.
